Hawaii statutes.
HAWAII
RULES OF EVIDENCE

ARTICLE I.

GENERAL
PROVISIONS

Rule 100 Title and citation. These
rules shall be known and cited as the Hawaii Rules of Evidence. Each rule
shall be cited by its number. A complete citation to a rule may read as
follows: Rule ___, Hawaii Rules of Evidence, Chapter 626, Hawaii Revised
Statutes. [L 1980, c 164, pt of §1]

RULE 100 COMMENTARY

The purpose of this chapter is to codify the law of
evidence, to promote informed judicial rulings on evidence points, and to
achieve uniformity in the treatment of evidence among the courts of this State.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next